Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-887.02
Auctioneers; nonresident; license; application; county clerk; fee; disposition.

Auctioneers of such foreign state, which requires a license or imposes regulations upon auctioneers of this state, who desire to conduct public sales in this state shall, before conducting any such sale, apply to the county clerk of any county in this state for a license to do so. The application shall include the applicant's social security number. Upon considering such application, the county clerk shall issue a license upon the payment of the same fee and compliance with the other requirements required of auctioneers of this state in such foreign state. Such fee shall be deposited with the county treasurer and credited to the general fund of the county.

Laws 1953, c. 339, § 2, p. 1112;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 220.